Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0273.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 8715. (1) In addition to the fees provided for in part 83, a registrant shall pay an annual water quality protection fee for each product to be registered. The water quality protection fee is $270.00 per product. The water quality protection fee is due in the office of the director before July 1. (2) A registrant shall pay an additional late fee of $100.00 for each pesticide if the pesticide registration is a renewal registration and the water quality protection fee is received by the department after June 30. (3) A person required to pay a specialty fertilizer or soil conditioner registration fee under section 8505 shall pay an additional $100.00 water quality protection fee for each brand and product name of each grade registered. (4) All fertilizer manufacturers or distributors licensed under part 85, except specialty fertilizer and soil conditioner registrants, shall pay $.0005 per pound of fertilizer sold. (5) The fees collected under this part, including any interest or dividends earned, must be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the money received to the fund. (6) On the expenditure or appropriation of money raised in this section for any purpose other than those specifically listed in this part, authorization to collect fees in this section must be suspended until the money expended or appropriated for purposes other than those listed in this part are returned to the fund. (7) The department may audit, or may contract for audits of records that are the basis for fees levied under this section. (8) This section is repealed October 1, 2029. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Secretary of the Senate Clerk of the House of Representatives Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor